District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.19

Transition.

(a)

A license to do business as an insurance agent or broker in the District issued prior to March 27, 2003, shall be valid.

(b)

This chapter shall not apply to any action, prosecution, or proceeding which is pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts and circumstances occurring before March 27, 2003.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 19, 50 DCR 260